Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2620.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 28-12-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 28-12 entitled "Minimum
Wages" is hereby amended to read as follows:
28-12-3. Minimum wages.
(a) Every employer shall pay to each of the employer’s employees: commencing July 1,
1999, at least the minimum wage of five dollars and sixty-five cents ($5.65) per hour. Commencing
September 1, 2000, the minimum wage is six dollars and fifteen cents ($6.15) per hour.
(b) Commencing January 1, 2004, the minimum wage is six dollars and seventy-five cents
($6.75) per hour.
(c) Commencing March 1, 2006, the minimum wage is seven dollars and ten cents ($7.10)
per hour.
(d) Commencing January 1, 2007, the minimum wage is seven dollars and forty cents
($7.40) per hour.
(e) Commencing January 1, 2013, the minimum wage is seven dollars and seventy-five
cents ($7.75) per hour.
(f) Commencing January 1, 2014, the minimum wage is eight dollars ($8.00) per hour.
(g) Commencing January 1, 2015, the minimum wage is nine dollars ($9.00) per hour.
(h) Commencing January 1, 2016, the minimum wage is nine dollars and sixty cents ($9.60)
per hour.
(i) Commencing January 1, 2018, the minimum wage is ten dollars and ten cents ($10.10)

per hour.
(j) Commencing January 1, 2019, the minimum wage is ten dollars and fifty cents ($10.50)
per hour.
(k) Commencing October 1, 2020, the minimum wage is eleven dollars and fifty cents
($11.50) per hour.
(l) Commencing January 1, 2022, the minimum wage is twelve dollars and twenty-five
cents ($12.25) per hour.
(m) Commencing January 1, 2023, the minimum wage is thirteen dollars ($13.00) per hour.
(n) Commencing January 1, 2024, the minimum wage is fourteen dollars ($14.00) per hour.
(o) Commencing January 1, 2025, the minimum wage is fifteen dollars ($15.00) per hour.
(p) Commencing January 1, 2026, the minimum wage is sixteen dollars ($16.00) per hour.
(q) Commencing January 1, 2027, the minimum wage is seventeen dollars ($17.00) twenty
dollars ($20.00) per hour.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005046
========
LC005046 - Page 2 of 3